California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) If the property to be released has been taken into custody under the levy, it shall be released to the person from whom it was taken unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the person does not claim the property to be released, the levying officer shall retain custody of the property and shall serve on the person a notice of where possession of the property may be obtained. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the person does not claim the property within 30 days after the notice is served, the levying officer shall sell the property in the manner provided by Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510), other than cash, which does not have a value exceeding its face value. The levying
 officer shall deposit the proceeds of sale and cash, after first deducting the levying officer’s costs, with the county treasurer of the county where the property is located, payable to the order of the person. If the amount deposited is not claimed by the person, or the legal representative of the person, within five years after the deposit is made by making application to the treasurer or other official designated by the county, it shall be paid into the general fund of the county.

(c) If the property to be released has not been taken into custody under the levy, the levying officer shall release the property by issuing a written notice of release and serving it on the person who was served with a copy of the writ and a notice of levy to create the lien. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(d) If the property to be released was levied upon by recording or filing a copy
 of the writ and a notice of levy, the levying officer shall record or file a written notice of release in the same office.

(e) The levying officer is not liable for releasing property in accordance with this section nor is any other person liable for acting in conformity with the release.

(f) The written direction to release property specified in subdivision (a) may be transmitted electronically to the levying officer pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263) of Title 4 of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 6.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

699.070.

(a) The court may appoint a receiver or order the levying officer to take any action the court orders that is necessary to preserve the value of property levied upon, including but not limited to selling the property, if the court determines that the property is perishable or will greatly deteriorate or greatly depreciate in value or that for some other reason the interests of the parties will be best served by the order. An order may be made under this subdivision upon application of the judgment creditor, the judgment debtor, or a person who has filed a third-party claim pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section
 720.010). The application shall be made on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires. Otherwise, the application may be made ex parte.

(b) If the levying officer determines that property levied upon is extremely perishable or will greatly deteriorate or greatly depreciate in value before a court order pursuant to subdivision (a) could be obtained, the levying officer may take any action necessary to preserve the value of the property or may sell the property. The levying officer is not liable for a determination made in good faith under this subdivision.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by order of the court, a sale of property pursuant to this section shall be made in the manner provided by Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) and the proceeds shall be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment in the manner provided by Article 7 (commencing
 with Section 701.810). Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 701.530, notice of sale shall be posted and served at a reasonable time before the sale, considering the character and condition of the property.

(d) If a receiver is appointed, the court shall fix the daily fee of the receiver and may order the judgment creditor to pay the fees and expenses of the receiver in advance or may direct that the whole or any part of the fees and expenses be paid from the proceeds of any sale of the property. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 564) and Chapter 5a (commencing with Section 571) of Title 7 govern the appointment, qualifications, powers, rights, and duties of a receiver appointed under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.080.

(a) A registered process server may levy under a writ of execution on the following types of property:

(1) Real property, pursuant to Section 700.015.

(2) Growing crops, timber to be cut, or minerals or the like including oil and gas, to be extracted or accounts
 receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead, pursuant to Section 700.020.

(3) Personal property in the custody of a levying officer, pursuant to Section 700.050.

(4) Personal property used as a dwelling, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 700.080.

(5) Deposit accounts, pursuant to Section 700.140.

(6) Property in a safe-deposit box, pursuant to Section 700.150.

(7) Accounts receivable or general intangibles, pursuant to Section 700.170.

(8) Final money judgments, pursuant to Section 700.190.

(9) Interest of a judgment debtor in
 personal property in the estate of a decedent, pursuant to Section 700.200.

(b) Before levying under the writ of execution, the registered process server shall cause to be deposited with the levying officer a copy of the writ and the fee, as provided by Section 26721 of the Government Code.

(c) If a registered process server levies on property pursuant to subdivision (a), the registered process server shall do both of the following:

(1) Comply with the applicable levy, posting, and service provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 700.010).

(2) Request any third person served to give a garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer in compliance with Section 701.030 on a form provided by the registered process server.

(d) Within five court days after levy under this section, all of the following shall be filed with the levying officer:

(1) The writ of execution.

(2) A proof of service by the registered process server stating the manner of levy performed.

(3) Proof of service of the copy of the writ and notice of levy on other persons, as required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 700.010).

(4) Instructions in writing, as required by the provisions of Section 687.010.

(e) If the fee provided by Section 26721 of the Government Code has been paid, the levying officer shall perform all other duties under the writ as if the levying officer had
 levied under the writ and shall return the writ to the court. If the registered process server does not comply with subdivisions (b) and (d), the levy is ineffective and the levying officer shall not be required to perform any duties under the writ, and may issue a release for any property sought to be levied upon.

(f) The fee for services of a registered process server under this section is a recoverable cost pursuant to Section 1033.5.

(g) A registered process server may levy more than once under the same writ of execution, provided that the writ is still valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 102, Sec. 2.   (AB 2211)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

699.090.

If property that is required by law to be registered or recorded in the name of the owner is levied upon under a writ of execution and it appears at the time of the levy that the judgment debtor was the registered or record owner of the property and the judgment creditor caused the levy to be made and the lien maintained in good faith and in reliance upon such registered or recorded ownership, neither the judgment creditor, the levying officer, nor the sureties on an undertaking given by the judgment creditor pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 720.110) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 720.210) of Division 4 is liable to a third
 person for the levy itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Writ of Execution and Notice of Levy [699.510. - 699.560.]

699.510.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), after entry of a money judgment, a writ of execution shall be issued by the clerk of the court, upon application of the judgment creditor, and shall be directed to the levying officer in the county where the levy is to be made and to any registered process server. The clerk of the court shall give priority to the application for, and issuance of, writs of execution
 on orders or judgments for child support and spousal support. A separate writ shall be issued for each county where a levy is to be made. Writs may be issued successively until the money judgment is satisfied, except that a new writ may not be issued for a county until the expiration of 180 days after the issuance of a prior writ for that county unless the prior writ is first returned.

(b) If the judgment creditor seeks a writ of execution to enforce a judgment made, entered, or enforceable pursuant to the Family Code, in addition to the requirements of this article, the judgment creditor shall satisfy the requirements of any applicable provisions of the Family Code.

(c) (1) The writ of execution shall be issued in the name of the judgment debtor as listed on the judgment, except that the judgment creditor shall omit the name of a judgment debtor from the
 application for a writ of execution if the liability of that judgment debtor has ceased with regard to the judgment, including either of the following occurrences:

(A) The judgment debtor has obtained a discharge of the judgment pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code and notice thereof has been filed with the court.

(B) The judgment creditor files an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with regard to the judgment debtor pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 724.010) of Division 5.

(2) The writ of execution shall include the additional name or names, and the type of legal entity, by which the judgment debtor is known, as set forth in the affidavit of identity, as defined in Section 680.135, filed by the judgment creditor with the application for issuance of the writ of execution. Prior to the
 clerk of the court issuing a writ of execution containing any additional name or names by which the judgment debtor is known that are not listed on the judgment, the court shall approve the affidavit of identity. If the court determines, without a hearing or a notice, that the affidavit of identity states sufficient facts upon which the judgment creditor has identified the additional names of the judgment debtor, the court shall authorize the issuance of the writ of execution with the additional name or names.

(d) In any case where the writ of execution lists any name other than that listed on the judgment, the person in possession or control of the levied property, if other than the judgment debtor, shall not pay to the levying officer the amount or deliver the property being levied upon until being notified to do so by the levying officer. The levying officer may not require the person, if other than the judgment debtor, in possession or
 control of the levied property to pay the amount or deliver the property levied upon until the expiration of 15 days after service of notice of levy.

(e) If a person who is not the judgment debtor has property erroneously subject to an enforcement of judgment proceeding based upon an affidavit of identity, the person shall be entitled to the recovery of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs from the judgment creditor incurred in releasing the person’s property from a writ of execution, in addition to any other damages or penalties to which an aggrieved person may be entitled to by law, including Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 176, Sec. 2.   (SB 551)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

699.520.

The writ of execution shall require the levying officer to whom it is directed to enforce the money judgment and shall include the following information:

(a) The date of issuance of the writ.

(b) The title of the court in which the judgment is entered and the cause and number of the action.

(c) Whether the judgment is for wages owed, child support, or spousal support. This subdivision shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(d) The name and address of the judgment creditor and the name and last known address of the judgment debtor. If the judgment debtor is other than a natural person, the
 type of legal entity shall be stated.

(e) The date of the entry of the judgment and of any subsequent renewals and where entered in the records of the court.

(f) The total amount of the money judgment as entered or renewed, together with costs thereafter added to the judgment pursuant to Section 685.090 and the accrued interest on the judgment from the date of entry or renewal of the judgment to the date of issuance of the writ, reduced by any partial satisfactions and by any amounts no longer enforceable.

(g) The amount required to satisfy the money judgment on the date the writ is issued.

(h) The amount of interest accruing daily on the principal amount of the judgment from the date the writ is issued.

(i) Whether any person has requested notice of sale under the judgment and, if so, the name and mailing address of that person.

(j) The sum of the fees and costs added to the judgment pursuant to Section 6103.5 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 68630) of Chapter 2 of Title 8 of the Government Code, and which is in addition to the amount owing to the judgment creditor on the judgment.

(k) Whether the writ of execution includes any additional names of the judgment debtor pursuant to an affidavit of identity, as defined in Section 680.135.

(l) A statement indicating whether the case is limited or unlimited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 36.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

699.530.

(a) Upon delivery of the writ of execution to the levying officer to whom the writ is directed, together with the written instructions of the judgment creditor, the levying officer shall execute the writ in the manner prescribed by law.

(b) The levying officer may not levy upon any property under the writ after the expiration of 180 days from the date the writ was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.540.

The notice of levy required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 700.010) shall inform the person notified of all of the following:

(a) The capacity in which the person is notified.

(b) The property that is levied upon.

(c) The person’s rights under the levy, including all of the following:

(1) The right to claim an exemption pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010).

(2) The right to make a third-party
 claim pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010).

(3) The right to, and the limitations of, the automatic exemption pursuant to Section 704.220. This paragraph shall become operative on September 1, 2020. 

(d) The person’s duties under the levy.

(e) All names listed in the writ of execution pursuant to an affidavit of identity, as defined in Section 680.135, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

699.545.

A copy of the original notice of levy which has been served upon a third party holding the property sought to be levied upon and the affidavit of identity, as defined in Section 680.135, if any, if served upon the judgment debtor or any other party, shall suffice as the notice of levy to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 639, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

699.550.

In any case where property has been levied upon and, pursuant to a levy, a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy are required by statute to be posted or to be served on or mailed to the judgment debtor or other person, failure to post, serve, or mail the copy of the writ and the notice does not affect the execution lien created by the levy. Failure to serve on or mail to the judgment debtor a list of exemptions does not affect the execution lien created by the levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.560.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the writ expires and the levying officer to whom the writ of execution is delivered shall return the writ to the court, or store the writ as provided in Section 263.6, and file a return with the court reporting the levying officer’s actions and an accounting of amounts collected, and costs incurred, at the earliest of the following times:

(1) Two years from the date of issuance of the writ, unless paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 706.022 is applicable.

(2) Promptly after all of the duties under the writ are performed.

(3) When return is requested in writing by the judgment creditor.

(4) If no levy takes place under the writ within 180 days after its issuance, promptly after the expiration of the 180-day period.

(5) Upon expiration of the time for enforcement of the money judgment.

(b) If a levy has been made under Section 700.200 upon an interest in personal property in the estate of a decedent, the writ shall be returned within the time prescribed in
 Section 700.200.

(c) If a levy has been made under Section 5103 of the Family Code on the judgment debtor’s right to the payment of benefits from an employee pension benefit plan, the writ shall be returned within the time prescribed in that section.

(d) If a levy has been made under the Wage Garnishment Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010)), and the earnings withholding order remains in effect, the writ of execution shall be returned as provided in subdivision (a) and a supplemental return shall be made as provided in Section 706.033.

(e) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (c) of Section 263, a levying officer may electronically file with the court the return, containing the information required by subdivision (a), pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263) of Title 4 of Part
 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 9.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property Subject to Execution [699.710. - 699.730.]

699.710.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all property that is subject to enforcement of a money judgment pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 695.010) of Chapter 1 is subject to levy under a writ of execution to satisfy a money judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

699.720.

(a) The following types of property are not subject to execution:

(1) An alcoholic beverage license that is transferable under Article 5 (commencing with Section 24070) of Chapter 6 of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The interest of a partner in a partnership or member in a limited liability company if the partnership or the limited liability company is not a judgment debtor.

(3) A cause of action that is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding.

(4) A judgment in favor of the judgment debtor prior to the expiration of the time for appeal from the judgment or, if an appeal is filed, prior to the final determination of the appeal.

(5) A debt (other than earnings) owing and unpaid by a public entity.

(6) The loan value of an unmatured life insurance, endowment, or annuity policy.

(7) A franchise granted by a public entity and all the rights and privileges of the franchise.

(8) The interest of a trust beneficiary.

(9) A
 contingent remainder, executory interest, or other interest in property that is not vested.

(10) Property in a guardianship or conservatorship estate.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) affects or limits the right of the judgment creditor to apply property to the satisfaction of a money judgment pursuant to any applicable procedure other than execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective June 6, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

699.730.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the principal place of residence of a judgment debtor is not subject to sale under execution of a judgment lien based on a consumer debt unless the debt was secured by the debtor’s principal place of residence at the time it was incurred. As used in this subdivision, “consumer debt” means debt incurred by an individual primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following types of unpaid
 debts:

 (1) Wages or employment benefits.

(2) Taxes.

(3) Child support.

(4) Spousal support.

(5) Fines and fees owed to governmental units.

(6) Tort judgments.

(7) (A) Debts, other than student loan debt, owed to a financial institution at the time of execution on the judgment lien, if both of the following requirements are met:

(i) The amount of the original judgment on which the lien is based, when entered, was greater than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), as adjusted pursuant to Section 703.150.

(ii) The amount owed on the outstanding judgment at the time of execution on the judgment lien is greater than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), as adjusted pursuant to Section 703.150.

(B) As used in this paragraph, the following terms
 have the following meanings:

(i) “Financial institution” means a financial institution, as defined in Section 680.200.

(ii) “Student loan debt” means debt based on any loan made to finance postsecondary education expenses, including tuition, fees, books, supplies, room and board, transportation, and personal expenses.
 Student loan debt includes debt based on a loan made to refinance a student loan, but does not include debt secured by the debtor’s principal place of residence at the time it was incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (AB 2463)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Methods of Levy [700.010. - 700.200.]

700.010.

(a) At the time of levy pursuant to this article or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the following on the judgment debtor:

(1) The writ of execution.

(2) A notice of levy.

(3) If the judgment debtor is a natural person, a copy of the form listing exemptions prepared by the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 681.030, the list of exemption amounts published pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 703.150, a copy of the form that the judgment debtor may use to make a claim of exemption pursuant to Section 703.520, and a copy of the form the judgment debtor may use to provide a financial statement pursuant to Section 703.530.

(4) Any affidavit of identity, as defined in Section 680.135, for names of the debtor listed on the writ of execution.

(b) Service under this section shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 4.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

700.015.

(a) To levy upon real property, the levying officer shall record with the recorder of the county where the real property is located a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy that describes the property levied upon and states that the judgment debtor’s interest in the described property has been levied upon. If the judgment debtor’s interest in the real property stands upon the records of the county in the name of a person other than the judgment debtor, the notice of levy shall identify the third person and the recorder shall index the copy of the writ and notice of levy in the names of both the judgment debtor and
 the third person.

(b) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy on any third person in whose name the judgment debtor’s interest in the real property stands upon the records of the county. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If service on the third person is by mail, it shall be sent to the person at the address for such person, if any, shown by the records of the office of the tax assessor of the county where the real property is located or, if no address is so shown, to the person at the address used by the county recorder for the return of the instrument creating the interest of the third person in the property.

(c) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy on one occupant of the real property. Service on the occupant shall
 be made by leaving the copy of the writ and a notice of levy with the occupant personally or, in the occupant’s absence, with a person of suitable age and discretion found upon the real property when service is attempted who is either an employee or agent of the occupant or a member of the occupant’s household. If unable to serve such an occupant at the time service is attempted, the levying officer shall post the copy of the writ and the notice of levy in a conspicuous place on the real property. If the real property described in the notice of levy consists of more than one distinct lot, parcel, or governmental subdivision and any of the lots, parcels, or governmental subdivisions lies with relation to any of the others so as to form one or more continuous, unbroken tracts, only one service or posting need be made under this subdivision as to each continuous, unbroken tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.020.

(a) To levy upon (1) growing crops, (2) timber to be cut, or (3) minerals or the like (including oil and gas) to be extracted or accounts receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead, the levying officer shall record with the recorder of the county where those crops, timber, or minerals or the like are located a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy that describes the property levied upon and states that the judgment debtor’s interest in the described property has been levied upon and
 describes the real property where the crops, timber, or minerals or the like are located. If the judgment debtor’s interest in the crops, timber, minerals or the like, or if the real property where the crops, timber, or minerals or the like are located, stands upon the records of the county in the name of a person other than the judgment debtor, the notice of levy shall identify the third person and the recorder shall index the copy of the writ and notice of levy in the names of both the judgment debtor and the third person.

(b) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy personally or by mail on the following persons:

(1) Any third person in whose name the judgment debtor’s interest in the crops, timber, minerals or the like stands upon the records of the county and any third person in whose name the real
 property stands upon the records of the county. If service on the third person is by mail, it shall be sent to the person at the address for the person, if any, shown by the records of the office of the assessor of the county where the real property is located or, if no address is so shown, to the person at the address used by the county recorder for the return of the instrument creating the interest of the third person in the property. 

(2) Any secured party who has filed a financing statement with respect to the crops, timber, or minerals or the like or the accounts receivable, prior to the date of levy on the property.

(c) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy on one occupant of the real property where the crops, timber, or minerals or the like are located. Service on the occupant shall be made by
 leaving the copy of the writ and a notice of levy with the occupant personally or, in the occupant’s absence, with a person of suitable age and discretion found upon the real property when service is attempted who is either an employee or agent of the occupant or a member of the occupant’s household. If he or she is unable to serve an occupant or suitable person at the time service is attempted, the levying officer shall post the copy of the writ and the notice of levy in a conspicuous place on the real property. However, the posting requirement of the preceding sentence shall not apply where the levy is made upon minerals or the like (but not including oil or gas) and no dwelling is located on the real property. If the real property described in the notice of levy consists of more than one distinct lot, parcel, or governmental subdivision and any of the lots, parcels, or governmental subdivisions lies with relation to any of the others so as to form one or more continuous, unbroken tracts, only one service
 or posting need be made under this subdivision as to each continuous, unbroken tract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1187, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

700.030.

Unless another method of levy is provided by this article, to levy upon tangible personal property in the possession or under the control of the judgment debtor, the levying officer shall take the property into custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.040.

(a) Unless another method of levy is provided by this article, to levy upon tangible personal property in the possession or under the control of a third person, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the third person.

(b) If goods are in the possession of a bailee who has issued a negotiable document of title therefor, the goods may not be levied upon but the negotiable document of title may be levied upon in the manner provided by Section 700.120. If goods are in the possession of a bailee other than one
 who has issued a negotiable document of title therefor, the goods may be levied upon in the manner provided by Section 700.060. As used in this subdivision, “bailee” means “bailee” as defined in Section 7102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.050.

(a) To levy upon personal property in the custody of a levying officer:

(1) If the writ of execution is directed to the levying officer having custody of the property, the judgment creditor shall deliver the writ to the levying officer.

(2) If the writ of execution is directed to a levying officer other than the levying officer having custody of the property, the levying officer to whom the writ is directed shall serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy on the levying officer having custody.
 Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(b) The levying officer having custody of the property shall comply with the writs in the order they are received and is not subject to the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 701.010) (duties and liabilities of third persons after levy).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.060.

(a) To levy upon goods in the possession of a bailee (as defined in Section 7102 of the Commercial Code) other than one who has issued a negotiable document of title therefor, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the bailee.

(b) If the goods described in subdivision (a) are subject to a security interest, the levying officer shall, if so instructed by the judgment creditor, serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the secured party. Service shall be made personally or by
 mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.070.

To levy upon tangible personal property of a going business in the possession or under the control of the judgment debtor, the levying officer shall comply with Section 700.030, except to the extent that the judgment creditor instructs that levy be made in the following manner:

(a) The levying officer shall place a keeper in charge of the business for the period requested by the judgment creditor. During the period, the business may continue to operate in the ordinary course of business
 provided that all sales are final and are for cash or its equivalent. For the purpose of this subdivision, a check is the equivalent of cash. The levying officer is not liable for accepting payment in the form of a cash equivalent. The keeper shall take custody of the proceeds from all sales unless otherwise directed by the judgment creditor.

(b) The levying officer shall take the tangible personal property into exclusive custody at the earliest of the following times:

(1) At any time the judgment debtor objects to placement of a keeper in charge of the business.

(2) At any time when requested by the judgment creditor.

(3) At the end of 10 days from the time the keeper is placed in charge of the business.

(c) Where a keeper is placed in a business for the purpose of taking into custody tangible personal property consisting solely of money or equivalent proceeds of sales, the provisions of subdivision (b) shall not apply, and the levying officer shall take such property into exclusive custody at the end of each daily keeper period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1159, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

700.080.

(a) To levy upon personal property used as a dwelling, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on one occupant of the property. Service on the occupant shall be made by leaving the copy of the writ and the notice of levy with the occupant personally or, in the occupant’s absence, with a person of suitable age and discretion found at the property when service is attempted who is a member of the occupant’s family or household. If unable to serve the occupant at the time service is attempted,
 the levying officer shall make the levy by posting the copy of the writ and the notice of levy in a conspicuous place on the property.

(b) If the judgment creditor so instructs, the levying officer shall place a keeper in charge of the property for a period requested by the judgment creditor.

(c) The judgment creditor may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order directing the levying officer to remove the occupants. The notice of motion shall be served on any legal owner and any junior lienholder who was served pursuant to Section 700.090, on the occupant, and, if the judgment debtor is not the occupant, on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. At the hearing on the motion the court shall determine the occupant’s right to possession and shall make an order including terms and conditions that are appropriate under the circumstances of the
 case.

(d) Personal property used as a dwelling shall include a mobilehome, whether the mobilehome is occupied or unoccupied at the time of the levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 446, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

700.090.

If a vehicle or vessel is levied upon and a certificate of ownership has been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles for such vehicle or vessel and the certificate of ownership is still in effect, or if a manufactured home, mobilehome, or commercial coach is levied upon and a permanent title record has been established by the Department of Housing and Community Development for such manufactured home, mobilehome, or commercial coach the levying officer shall determine from the appropriate department the name and address of the legal owner and each junior lienholder of the property levied upon. If the legal owner or junior lienholder is not the
 judgment debtor and is not in possession of the vehicle, vessel, manufactured home, mobilehome, or commercial coach, the levying officer shall at the time of levy or promptly thereafter serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the legal owner or junior lienholder. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1124, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

700.100.

(a) To levy upon chattel paper, the levying officer shall:

(1) If the chattel paper is in the possession of the judgment debtor, take the chattel paper into custody.

(2) If the chattel paper is in the possession of a third person, personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the third person.

(b) If the levying officer obtains custody of the chattel paper or if pursuant to a security agreement the judgment
 debtor has liberty to collect or compromise the chattel paper or to accept the return of goods or make repossessions, the levying officer shall, if so instructed by the judgment creditor, serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the account debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) In addition to any other rights created by a levy on chattel paper, the levy creates a lien on the judgment debtor’s rights in specific goods subject to the chattel paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.110.

(a) To levy upon an instrument, the levying officer shall:

(1) If the instrument is in the possession of the judgment debtor, take the instrument into custody.

(2) If the instrument is in the possession of a third person, personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the third person.

(b) If the levying officer obtains custody of the instrument, the levying officer shall, if the judgment creditor so instructs,
 serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the obligor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.120.

To levy upon a negotiable document of title, the levying officer shall:

(a) If the negotiable document of title is in the possession of the judgment debtor, take the negotiable document of title into custody.

(b) If the negotiable document of title is in the possession of a third person, personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)